New York, session 2025-2026, A6779.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the asses- 2 sor of the city of Mount Vernon is hereby authorized to accept from the 3 Church of Jesus Christ (Apostolic), Inc. an application for exemption 4 from real property taxes pursuant to section 420-a of the real property 5 tax law for the assessment rolls 1996-1998, for the parcel located at 6 332-340 South Columbus Avenue in the city of Mount Vernon. If accepted, 7 the applications shall be reviewed as if they had been received on or 8 before the taxable status date established for such rolls. If satisfied 9 that the Church of Jesus Christ (Apostolic), Inc. (i) acquired title to 10 the property for which it seeks exemption in March 1996 and (ii) would 11 otherwise be entitled to such exemption if such corporation filed an 12 application for the exemption on or before the appropriate taxable 13 status dates, the assessor, upon approval by the city council of the 14 city of Mount Vernon, whichever the case may be, may grant exemption 15 from taxation on such assessment rolls and make the appropriate 16 corrections of the subject rolls. If exemptions are granted and such 17 corporation, therefore, shall have paid any tax with respect to the 18 subject rolls, the applicable governing body or tax departments, in 19 their sole discretion, shall provide for the refund of the taxes paid 20 and cancel taxes remaining unpaid. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09257-01-5